Utah statutes.
58-60-105.   Continuing education.

(1)  By rule made under Section 58-1-203, the division may establish a continuing education requirement as a condition for renewal of any license classification under this chapter upon finding continuing education for that profession is necessary to reasonably protect the public health, safety, or welfare.

(2)  If a renewal cycle is extended or shortened under Section 58-60-104, the continuing education hours required for license renewal under this section shall be increased or decreased proportionally.



Enacted by Chapter 32, 1994 General Session

